Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2242
Area testing, defined.

Area testing shall mean testing of a random sample of each swine herd in a program area.

Laws 1990, LB 1004, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 54-2208.01;

Laws 1991, LB 359, § 7.